Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.250

Town attorney—Duties.

The town attorney shall advise the town authorities and officers in all legal matters pertaining to the business of the town.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.27.250. Prior: 1890 p 212 s 171; RRS s 9189.]

NOTES:

Employment of legal interns: RCW 35.21.760.